District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-4103

Establishment of the Sex Offender Registration Advisory Council.

Repealed.

June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-274, § 4, 44 DCR 1232
July 11, 2000, D.C. Law 13-137, § 19, 47 DCR 797

History

1981 Ed., § 24-1103.

Prior Codifications

For temporary (90-day) amendment of § 24-1116, see § 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Immunity From Liability Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-50, April 6, 1999, 46 DCR 3634).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 19 of the Sex Offender Registration Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-133, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6771).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 19 of the Sex Offender Registration Legislative Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-176, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9244).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 19 of the Sex Offender Registration Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-229, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 487).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 19 of the Sex Offender Registration Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-308, April 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2714).

Emergency Legislation